Utah statutes.
78B-6-506.   Right of entry for survey and location.
(1)  If land is required for public use, the person or the person's agent in
charge of the use may survey and locate the property.  It must be located in
the manner which will be most compatible with the greatest public good and the
least private injury, and subject to the provisions of this chapter.
(2) (a)  The person or the person's agent in charge of the public use may, at
reasonable times and upon reasonable notice, enter upon the land and make
examinations, surveys, and maps of the land.
(b)  Entry upon land as authorized under Subsection (2)(a) does not constitute
a cause of action in favor of the owners of the lands, except for actual
damage to the land and improvements on the land caused by the entry and which
is not repaired on or before the date the examinations and surveys are
completed.
